Utah statutes.
63C-7-206.   Executive committee -- Powers and duties.

The executive committee shall:

(1)  manage the affairs and business of the Utah Communications Agency Network consistent with this chapter;

(2)  appoint an executive director to administer the Utah Communications Agency Network;

(3)  receive and act upon reports covering the operations of the communications network and funds administered by the Utah Communications Agency Network;

(4)  ensure that the communications network and funds are administered according to law;

(5)  examine and approve an annual operating budget for the Utah Communications Agency Network;

(6)  receive and act upon recommendations of the chair;

(7)  recommend to the governor and Legislature any necessary or desirable changes in the statutes governing the communications network;

(8)  develop broad policies for the long-term operation of the Utah Communications Agency Network for the performance of its functions;

(9)  make and execute contracts and other instruments on behalf of the Utah Communications Agency Network, including agreements with members and other entities;

(10)  authorize the borrowing of money, the incurring of indebtedness, and the issuance of bonds as provided in this chapter;

(11)  adopt rules consistent with this chapter for the management of the communications network in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and perform all other acts necessary for the administration of the communications network;

(12)  exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred on it by this chapter; and

(13)  provide for audits of the Utah Communications Agency Network.

